src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


! ===== !
! Verbs !
! ===== !


!! # Even syllabled verbs

LEXICON V_EVEN_E !båhtet
+V:     V_EVEN_E_STR ;
+V:e^WG V_EVEN_E_WK ;

LEXICON V_EVEN_E_STR
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á%> #;
!+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:a%> #; !just as an example, for possible later implementation
+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:e%>behttin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:e%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:e%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>behttit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:e%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;

+Inf:e%>t # ; 
+GerII:e%>min # ; !aka: +Actio+Ess ?
+PrfPrc:á%>m # ;
+PrsPrc:e%>j # ; 
+Vsubst:e%>m V_SUBST_EVEN_s2 ; 

LEXICON V_EVEN_E_WK
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v^V2E2AA #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>^V2E2AA #;
:^IJ%>j V_EVEN_E_WK_J ; !suffixes with -j-element that trigger e->i in V2

+Imprt+Sg2:%> #; 

+GerI:%>din # ;  
+ConNeg:%> # ; 
!+VGen:%> #; !keeping as comment for now, but replaced with verb.adv. in next line
+Der/VAdv+Adv:%>n #; !e.g. jåden "while migrating"
!+Der/VAdv+Adv+Use/NG:%> #; !main form according to Lehtiranta 1992 (cf. p. 151)
+Sup:%>^V2E2AAtjit # ;
+Pot:%>tj^V2E2AA V_EVEN_POT ; 

LEXICON V_EVEN_E_WK_J
+Ind+Prt+Sg3: #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:min #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:din #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3: 3DUPRT ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:me #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:de #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:mä #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NG:dä #;


LEXICON V_EVEN_E_G3 !guäddet, däddet
+V:     V_EVEN_E_STR_G3 ; !special case to force G3 for correct output of ua/uä
+V:e^WG V_EVEN_E_WK ; !same as all V_EVEN_E

LEXICON V_EVEN_E_STR_G3 !
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^G3^UAUML%> #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:e^G3^UAUML%>behttin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:e^G3^UAUML%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:e^G3^UAUML%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e^G3^UAUML%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e^G3^UAUML%>behttit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e^G3^UAUML%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:e^G3^UAUML%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;

+Inf:e^G3^UAUML%>t # ; 
+GerII:e^G3^UAUML%>min # ; !aka: +Actio+Ess ?
+PrfPrc:á^G3^UAUML%>m # ;
+PrsPrc:e^G3^UAUML%>j # ; 
+Vsubst:e^G3^UAUML%>m V_SUBST_EVEN_s2 ; 





LEXICON V_EVEN_A !dahkat
+V:     V_EVEN_A_STR ;
+V:a^WG V_EVEN_A_WK ;

LEXICON V_EVEN_A_STR
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á%> #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:a%>behttin #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:a%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:a%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:a%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a%>behttit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:e%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;

+Inf:a%>t # ; 
+GerII:a%>min # ;
+PrfPrc:a%>m # ;
+PrsPrc:e%>j # ; 
+Vsubst:a%>m V_SUBST_EVEN_s2 ; 

LEXICON V_EVEN_A_WK
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%> #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmin #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jdin #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>j 3DUPRT ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%>jmä #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NG:%>jdä #;

+Imprt+Sg2:%> #; 

+GerI:%>din # ;  
+Sup:%>tjit # ;
+ConNeg:%> # ; 
!+VGen:%> #; !keeping as comment for now, but replaced with verb.adv. in next line
+Der/VAdv+Adv:%>n #;
+Pot:%>tj V_EVEN_POT ;



LEXICON V_EVEN_A_G3 !snuaggat
+V:     V_EVEN_A_STR_G3 ; !special case to force G3 for correct output of ua/uä
+V:a^WG V_EVEN_A_WK ; !same as all V_EVEN_E

LEXICON V_EVEN_A_STR_G3 !
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^G3^UAUML%> #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:a^G3^UAUML%>behttin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:a^G3^UAUML%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:a^G3^UAUML%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:a^G3^UAUML%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a^G3^UAUML%>behttit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a^G3^UAUML%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:e^G3^UAUML%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;

+Inf:a^G3^UAUML%>t # ; 
+GerII:a^G3^UAUML%>min # ; !aka: +Actio+Ess ?
+PrfPrc:a^G3^UAUML%>m # ;
+PrsPrc:a^G3^UAUML%>j # ; 
+Vsubst:e^G3^UAUML%>m V_SUBST_EVEN_s2 ; 


LEXICON V_GILGIJ !special case for deviant gilgij-forms of gallgat
+V:	V_GILGIJ_FORMS ;

LEXICON V_GILGIJ_FORMS !see above
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmin #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jdin #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>j 3DUPRT ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%>jmä #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NG:%>jdä #;



LEXICON V_EVEN_O !viessot, årrot
+V:     V_EVEN_O_STR ;
+V:o^WG V_EVEN_O_WK ;

LEXICON V_EVEN_O_STR
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:u%> #; !should this be -u-?
+Ind+Prs+Du1:u%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:o%>behttin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:o%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:o%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:o%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:o%>behttit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:o%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:u%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:u%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:u%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:u%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:o%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:u%>t #;

+Inf:o%>t # ; 
+GerII:o%>min # ;
+PrfPrc:u%>m # ;
+PrsPrc:o%>j # ; 
+Vsubst:o%>m V_SUBST_EVEN_s2 ; 
+Sup:u^WG%>tjit # ; !weak grade but with -u- i V2!! ex: urutjit (för att bo)


LEXICON V_EVEN_O_WK
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%> #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmin #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jdin #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>j 3DUPRT ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%>jmä #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NG:%>jdä #;

+Imprt+Sg2:%> #; 

+GerI:%>din # ;  
+ConNeg:%> # ; 
!+VGen:%> #; !keeping as comment for now, but replaced with verb.adv. in next line
+Der/VAdv+Adv:%>n #;
+Pot:%>tj V_EVEN_POT ; 



LEXICON V_EVEN_O_G3 !luabbot
+V:     V_EVEN_O_STR_G3 ; !special case to force G3 for correct output of ua/uä
+V:o^WG V_EVEN_O_WK ; !same as all V_EVEN_E

LEXICON V_EVEN_O_STR_G3 !
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:u%> #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:u%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:o^G3^UAUML%>behttin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:o^G3^UAUML%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:o^G3^UAUML%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:o^G3^UAUML%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:o^G3^UAUML%>behttit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:o^G3^UAUML%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:u%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:u%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:u%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:u%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:o^G3^UAUML%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:u%>t #;

+Inf:o^G3^UAUML%>t # ; 
+GerII:o^G3^UAUML%>min # ; !aka: +Actio+Ess ?
+PrfPrc:u%>m # ;
+PrsPrc:o^G3^UAUML%>j # ; 
+Vsubst:o^G3^UAUML%>m V_SUBST_EVEN_s2 ; 



LEXICON V_EVEN_Å !hållåt, bårråt
+V:     V_EVEN_Å_STR ;
+V:å^WG V_EVEN_Å_WK ;

LEXICON V_EVEN_Å_STR
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:á%> #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Ind+Prs+Du2:å%>behttin #;
!+Ind+Prs+Du2:å%>bähtten #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:å%> 3DUPRS ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:å%>p #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:å%>behttit #;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:å%>bähttet #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%> #; 
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+Imprt+Du2:e%>n # ; 
+Imprt+Pl2:i%>t #;

+Inf:å%>t # ; 
+GerII:å%>min # ;
+PrfPrc:å%>m # ;
+PrsPrc:e%>j # ; !-åt cognate with -at verbs in saL/saN, which also get -ej
+Vsubst:å%>m V_SUBST_EVEN_s2 ; 

LEXICON V_EVEN_Å_WK
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%> #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmin #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jdin #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>j 3DUPRT ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%>jmä #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NG:%>jdä #;

+Imprt+Sg2:%> #; 

+GerI:%>din # ;  
+Sup:%>tjit # ;
+ConNeg:%> # ; 
!+VGen:%> #; !keeping as comment for now, but replaced with verb.adv. in next line
+Der/VAdv+Adv:%>n #;
+Pot:%>tj V_EVEN_POT ; 


!LEXICON V_EVEN_Å_G3 !does not exist (V2 -å- always has V1 -å-)


!POT forms for V_EVEN_
LEXICON V_EVEN_POT !
+Sg1:a%>v #;
+Sg2:a%> #;
+Sg3:a%> #;
+Sg3+Use/NG:%> #;
+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Du2:ä%>hppen #;
+Du3:e%>ba #;
+Pl1:i%>p #;
+Pl2:i%>hppit #;
+Pl3:i%> #; 



!! # Odd syllabled verbs
