src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb   !!= * **@CODE@** is the main lexicon
gallgat:gilgi V_GILGIJ "shall" ; ! no. 522
bassat:bass V_EVEN_A "wash" ; ! no. 149
bårådallat:bårådall V_EVEN_A "be bitten" ; ! no. 257
duahttat:du^Ohtt V_EVEN_A "touch" ; ! no. 3257
gallgat:gallg V_EVEN_A "shall" ; ! no. 522
gillat:gilºl V_EVEN_A "tolerate, endure, sustain" ; ! no. 91084
gärrgat:gierrg V_EVEN_A "get prepared, get ready" ; ! no. 790
jiskudallat:jiskudall V_EVEN_A "make someone feel safe and secure" ; ! no. 4421
lierrat:lierr V_EVEN_A "learn" ; ! no. 1032
måjvordallat:måjvordall V_EVEN_A "feel sick, ill" ; ! no. 4257
nuhttsat:nuhtts V_EVEN_A "rant, brawl" ; ! no. 2471
ruahttat:ru^Ohtt V_EVEN_A "rush off, run fast" ; ! no. 90957
siedjat:siedj V_EVEN_A "fester" ; ! no. 4297
sjäkktjat:sjiekktj V_EVEN_A "check secretly" ; ! no. 4152
stuajjkat:stu^Ojjk V_EVEN_A "splash" ; ! no. 2667
tjihttat:tjihtt V_EVEN_A "seal, caulk" ; ! no. 3792
veludallat:veludall V_EVEN_A "rest a little bit" ; ! no. 3024
snuaggat:snu^Ogg V_EVEN_A_G3 "spy, snoop" ; ! no. 1698
bajjket:bajjk V_EVEN_E "defecate, poop" ; ! no. 6034
bájjtet:bájjt V_EVEN_E "shine" ; ! no. 2786
buvvet:buvv V_EVEN_E "strangle" ; ! no. 3706
bähttet:biehtt V_EVEN_E "cheat, deceive" ; ! no. 3227
dumpalasstet:dumpalasst V_EVEN_E "be reckless" ; ! no. 5808
däfftet+Use/NG:dievvd V_EVEN_E "fill up" ; ! no. 91348
gállet:gáll V_EVEN_E "wade" ; ! no. 521
guorret+Use/NG:gu^Odd V_EVEN_E "leave, vacate" ; ! no. 90414
harrdet:harrd V_EVEN_E "irritate, agitate" ; ! no. 5754
ierájdahttet:ierájdahtt V_EVEN_E "take away" ; ! no. 91469
luäjjtalahttet:luäjjtalahtt V_EVEN_E "release one after another" ; ! no. 91510
mårrdet:mårrd V_EVEN_E "tie the upper and lower strings of a net" ; ! no. 1215
rijjdet:rijjd V_EVEN_E "argue, quarrel" ; ! no. 1411
tjassket:tjassk V_EVEN_E "throw, cast, discard" ; ! no. 1883
varrdet:varrd V_EVEN_E "bleed" ; ! no. 3287
vuodjet+Use/NG:vu^Ojj V_EVEN_E "drive" ; ! no. 90945
åsstet:åsst V_EVEN_E "buy" ; ! no. 3918
guäddet:gu^Odd V_EVEN_E_G3 "carry" ; ! no. 717
binnot:binºn V_EVEN_O "decrease, shrink" ; ! no. 3177
bähttot:biehtt V_EVEN_O "warn" ; ! no. 270
duasstot:du^Osst V_EVEN_O "meet, receive" ; ! no. 381
dälbmot:dielbm V_EVEN_O "trample, tread" ; ! no. 408
gávvlot:gávvl V_EVEN_O "cut off skin from reindeer leg" ; ! no. 2609
gågglot:gåggl V_EVEN_O "throw up food (by a dog)" ; ! no. 730
gåvvgot:gåvvg V_EVEN_O "be slightly open" ; ! no. 579
jiegŋot:jiegŋ V_EVEN_O "freeze, ice over" ; ! no. 4586
lávvlot:lávvl V_EVEN_O "sing" ; ! no. 1026
låjjgot:låjjg V_EVEN_O "release, thaw" ; ! no. 2752
njihkot:njihk V_EVEN_O "whine, whimper (for dogs)" ; ! no. 1288
ruasstot:ru^Osst V_EVEN_O "rust" ; ! no. 5087
sjkilltjot:sjkilltj V_EVEN_O "form a layer of ice" ; ! no. 1574
skávvot:skávv V_EVEN_O "form snow crust" ; ! no. 90340
sårrjot:sårrj V_EVEN_O "quickly grab onto something" ; ! no. 2511
vasskot:vassk V_EVEN_O "scrape, scrub" ; ! no. 2098
guardnjot:gu^Ordnj V_EVEN_O_G3 "climb up" ; ! no. 3717
luabbot:lu^Obb V_EVEN_O_G3 "spread out" ; ! no. 1055
luaddot:lu^Odd V_EVEN_O_G3 "chop (firewood)" ; ! no. 5274
tjuadtjot:tju^Odtj V_EVEN_O_G3 "stand upright, stand" ; ! no. 3724
vuardnot:vu^Ordn V_EVEN_O_G3 "reject" ; ! no. 2142
båsskåt:båssk V_EVEN_Å "poke with a needle or stick" ; ! no. 3299
dållgåt:dållg V_EVEN_Å "ride behind, be pulled behind" ; ! no. 420
gådtjåt:gådtj V_EVEN_Å "urinate, pee" ; ! no. 775
gåhtsåt:gåhts V_EVEN_Å "slow down" ; ! no. 741
gållgåt:gållg V_EVEN_Å "flow, run, drift" ; ! no. 755
gårrsåt:gårrs V_EVEN_Å "clear one's throat" ; ! no. 766
håjjgåt:håjjg V_EVEN_Å "push, shove, throw" ; ! no. 4929
jåkksåt:jåkks V_EVEN_Å "catch up, manage on time, catch" ; ! no. 952
jåvvgåt:jåvvg V_EVEN_Å "get snowed in" ; ! no. 962
låhkåt:låhk V_EVEN_Å "read; study" ; ! no. 1089
njållgåt:njållg V_EVEN_Å "trot (for reindeer)" ; ! no. 1312
nåhkåt:nåhk V_EVEN_Å "run out, finish" ; ! no. 1329
sjåvvåt:sjåvv V_EVEN_Å "rain heavily, rush (for water)" ; ! no. 1609
snårråt:snårr V_EVEN_Å "tangle up" ; ! no. 1707
tjållgåt:tjållg V_EVEN_Å "spit, drool" ; ! no. 1971
åhppåt:åhpp V_EVEN_Å "learn" ; ! no. 2247
